Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2,189
Known claims against dissolved corporation.

(MBCA 14.06) (a) A dissolved
corporation may dispose of the known claims against it by notifying its known
claimants in writing of the dissolution at any time after its effective date.

(b) The written notice must:

(1) Describe information
that must be included in a claim;

(2) Provide a mailing address where a claim may be
sent;

(3)
State the deadline, which may not be fewer than one hundred twenty days after
the effective date of the written notice, by which the dissolved corporation
must receive the claim; and

(4)
State that the claim will be barred if not received by the deadline.

(c) A claim against the dissolved
corporation is barred:

(1)
If a claimant who was given written notice under subsection (b) of this section
does not deliver the claim to the dissolved corporation by the deadline; or

(2) If a claimant whose claim
was rejected by the dissolved corporation does not commence a proceeding to
enforce the claim within ninety days after the effective date of the rejection
notice.

(d)
For purposes of this section, claim does not include a contingent liability
or a claim based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 189.
January 1, 2017